Utah statutes.
32B-15-302.   Action for contribution by provider of an alcoholic product.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3), a person, as defined under Section 32B-15-201 or Subsection 32B-15-202(1), against whom an award is made under this chapter, may bring a separate cause of action for contribution against any person causing the injury and damage.

(b)  The maximum amount for which a person causing the injury and damage may be liable to a person seeking contribution is that percentage or proportion of the damages equivalent to the percentage or proportion of fault attributed to that person causing the injury and damage.

(2)  This action for contribution under this section may not be brought against:

(a)  a person entitled to recovery as described in Subsection 32B-15-201(1)(a)(i) or (ii); or

(b)  a person entitled to recover as described in Subsection 32B-15-201(2)(a)(i) or (ii).

(3)  An action for contribution under this section may not diminish the amount of recovery for injury or damages awarded and received to a person entitled to recover as described in Subsection 32B-15-201(1)(a)(i) or (ii) or 32B-15-201(2)(a)(i) or (ii):

(a)  in a cause of action brought under this chapter; or

(b)  in a separate cause of action for injury and damage that is not brought under this chapter.

